Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1308XS (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. 248 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 1 CONTRACTS WITH CONTRACTORS ââ QUALIFIED RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT 2 PROGRAMS. 3 1. a. In all contracts executed with a contractor to 4 provide a qualified residential treatment program, the 5 department of health and human services shall include a 6 provision that allows the contractor to reject a placement 7 of an individual referred by the department of health and 8 human services, or juvenile court services, if the contractor 9 confirms in writing to the department of health and human 10 services, or juvenile court services, that the contractor does 11 not have the necessary security or support to ensure the safety 12 of the individual or the safety of the contractorâs staff. 13 b. The department of health and human services shall not 14 include any type of âno reject, no ejectâ provision in any 15 contract executed with a contractor to provide a qualified 16 residential treatment program. For purposes of this paragraph, 17 âno reject, no ejectâ means that the contractor shall be 18 required to accept all individual placements referred by the 19 department of health and human services or juvenile court 20 services. 21 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to all contracts 22 between the department of health and human services and 23 a contractor for the provision of a qualified residential 24 treatment program that are executed, extended, or renewed on or 25 after the effective date of this Act. 26